Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
CHAPTER 6 Credit or Loan Discrimination

Cross references.

Prohibition of discrimination in sale, lease, or financing of housing accommodations, §

8-3-200

et seq.

7-6-1.
Discrimination in extending credit or making loans prohibited.

No bank, lending company, financial institution, retail installment seller, or person extending credit may discriminate or provide requirements which discriminate in the extending of credit or the making of loans solely on the basis of sex, race, religion, national origin, or marital status.

Any person, firm, or corporation which willfully violates any provision of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $1,000.00.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 772, §§ 1, 3.

Law reviews.

For article, “Religious Exercise as Credit Risk,” see 10 Bank. Dev. J. 119 (1993-1994).

7-6-2.
Cause of action for individual discriminated against.

Any person denied a loan or credit solely on the basis of discrimination because of sex, race, religion, national origin, or marital status shall have a right to bring an action for damages in any court of competent jurisdiction in an individual, but not in a representative, capacity against the person, firm, or corporation violating this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 772, § 2.